Colorado, session 2026A, SB050.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 26.5-5-314, add (7) as
follows:
26.5-5-314. Standards for facilities and agencies - rules -
definition.
(7) A CHILD CARE CENTER SHALL DISCLOSE THE FOLLOWING
INFORMATION IN THE CHILD CARE CENTER'S POLICIES AND PROCEDURES TO
THE PARENTS OR GUARDIANS OF CHILDREN BEING SERVED AT THE CHILD
CARE CENTER:
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

(a) A STATEMENT THAT CHILD CARE CENTER WORKERS ARE
MANDATORY REPORTERS OF CHILD ABUSE OR NEGLECT, AS REQUIRED BY
SECTION 19-3-304 (2)(m); AND
(b) FOR A CHILD CARE CENTER THAT UTILIZES VIDEO RECORDING
EQUIPMENT, A STATEMENT DISCLOSING THE USE OF VIDEO RECORDING
EQUIPMENT AND THE CHILD CARE CENTER'S POLICIES AND PROCEDURES
REGARDING THE USE OF THE VIDEO RECORDING EQUIPMENT AND THE
GENERATED VIDEO FOOTAGE, INCLUDING, WHEN APPLICABLE, THE CENTER'S
RECORDING, RETENTION, AND DISPOSAL POLICY; PRIVACY PROTECTIONS AND
LIMITATIONS; PARENTAL AND LEGAL ACCESS TO THE VIDEO FOOTAGE; AND
ANY OTHER POLICIES OR PROCEDURES THE CHILD CARE CENTER DEVELOPS IN
RELATION TO THE USE OF THE VIDEO RECORDING EQUIPMENT AND THE
GENERATED VIDEO FOOTAGE.
SECTION 2. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within
such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
PAGE 2-SENATE BILL 26-050

approved by the people at the general election to be held in November 2026
and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official declaration of
the vote thereon by the governor.
____________________________ ____________________________
James Rashad Coleman, Sr. Julie McCluskie
PRESIDENT OF SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
____________________________ ____________________________
Esther van Mourik Vanessa Reilly
SECRETARY OF CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 3-SENATE BILL 26-050